District of Columbia statutes.
2-1571

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Acceptable level of school attendance” means that a student has not accrued unexcused absences exceeding 5% of the total days in a school year and has not violated the requirements for mandatory school attendance under § 38-202.

(2)

“Eligible District youth” means an individual who is a domiciliary of the District and is between 14 and 19 years of age.

(3)

“Institute” means the Mayor’s Youth Leadership Institute.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-32, § 2, 52 DCR 7475